Utah statutes.
51-9-405.   Substance Abuse Prevention Account established -- Funding --
Uses.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the Substance Abuse Prevention Account.
(2) (a)  The Division of Finance shall allocate to the Substance Abuse
Prevention Account from the collected surcharge established in Section
51-9-401:
(i)  2.5% for the juvenile court, but not to exceed the amount appropriated by
the Legislature; and
(ii)  2.5% for the State Office of Education, but not to exceed the amount
appropriated by the Legislature.
(b)  The juvenile court shall use the allocation to pay for compensatory
service programs required by Subsection 78A-6-117(2)(m).
(c)  The State Office of Education shall use the allocation in public school
programs for:
(i)  substance abuse prevention and education;
(ii)  substance abuse prevention training for teachers and administrators; and
(iii)  district and school programs to supplement, not supplant, existing
local prevention efforts in cooperation with local substance abuse
authorities.
